Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 2. Corporate Matters.

Sec. 10.13.120.
Corporate name and representation of status.

The corporate name of a licensee must include the word “BIDCO” or “Bidco” and must be distinguishable on the records of the department from the name of any other organized entity and from a reserved or registered name. A licensee may not transact business under a name other than its corporate name. In this subsection, “organized entity” and “reserved or registered name” have the meanings given in AS

10.35.040

.

Before being issued a license, a corporation that proposes to apply for a license or that applies for a license may perform, under a name that indicates that the corporation is a corporation licensed under this chapter, the acts necessary to apply for and obtain a license and otherwise prepare to begin business as a licensee. The corporation may not represent that it is a licensee until after the license has been obtained.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992; am § 10 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For applicability of amendment to (a) of this section made by § 10, ch. 50, SLA 1999, see § 36(a) and (b), ch. 50, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.13.130.
Board of directors.

The board of directors of a licensee must have at least seven directors.

The board of directors shall hold at least one meeting each calendar quarter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.140.
Notice of officer and director changes.

Within 30 days of each of the following events, the licensee shall notify the department in writing of the event and provide any additional information that the department requires:

the death, resignation, or removal of a director or officer;

the election of a director; or

the appointment of an officer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.150.
Dividends.

A licensee may not pay or obligate itself to pay a cash dividend or dividend in kind to the licensee’s shareholders unless the payment is consistent with a dividend policy that has been adopted by the licensee and approved by the department.

When approving dividend policies under this section, the department shall consider the special characteristics of BIDCOs and the diverse range of dividend policies that are potentially appropriate for a BIDCO, without allowing the licensee to engage in unsafe or unsound acts that could threaten the viability of the licensee as an ongoing BIDCO by eroding its capital base.

The department may at any time withdraw a previous approval of a dividend policy if the department determines that the withdrawal is necessary to prevent unsafe or unsound acts.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.160.
Share buy-back.

A licensee may not buy back or obligate itself to buy back a share of equity interest from a shareholder without the prior approval of the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)